District of Columbia statutes.
9-1107.03

Consent of Council to Compact amendments.

(a)

The District of Columbia hereby consents to, adopts, and enacts amendments to Articles I and XVI of Title III of the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Regulation Compact as set out in § 9-1107.01.

(b)

The Mayor of the District of Columbia is authorized and directed to enter into and execute on behalf of the District of Columbia amendments, substantially as set forth in subsection (a) of this section, to Title III of the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Regulation Compact with the Commonwealth of Virginia and the State of Maryland, which amendments shall become effective immediately upon execution of same.

History

June 11, 1976, D.C. Law 1-67, §§ 2, 3, 23 DCR 501

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2433.
1973 Ed., § 1-1431-1a.

References in Text

The amendments referred to in subsection (a) of this section are to §§ 1 and 76 of the Compact.